Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1521
Validation measures; required.

A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall determine a patient's benefit with the hearing instrument fitting using validation measures, such as speech audiometry and validated communication assessment questionnaires, or any other method approved by the board for ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 25.